District of Columbia statutes.
7-623

Declaration — Restrictions.

A declaration shall have no effect if the declarant is a patient in an intermediate care or skilled care facility as defined in the Health Care Facilities Regulation, enacted June 14, 1974 (Reg. 74-15; 20 DCR 1423 ) at the time the declaration is executed unless 1 of the 2 witnesses to the directive is a patient advocate or ombudsman. The patient advocate or ombudsman shall have the same qualifications as a witness under § 7-622.

Feb. 25, 1982, D.C. Law 4-69, § 4, 28 DCR 5047
1981 Ed., § 6-2423.